incubator/apertium-swa-eng/dev/apertium-sw-en.sw.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="c1c2"/>
    <sdef n="c3c10"/>
    <sdef n="c3c4"/>
    <sdef n="c9c10"/>
    <sdef n="c5c6"/>
    <sdef n="c11c10"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="c1"/>
    <sdef n="c2"/>
    <sdef n="c3"/>
    <sdef n="c4"/>
    <sdef n="c5"/>
    <sdef n="c6"/>
    <sdef n="c7"/>
    <sdef n="c8"/>
    <sdef n="c9"/>
    <sdef n="c10"/>
    <sdef n="c11"/>
    <sdef n="c12"/>
    <sdef n="c13"/>
    <sdef n="c14"/>
    <sdef n="c15"/>
    <sdef n="c16"/>
    <sdef n="c17"/>
    <sdef n="c18"/>
    <sdef n="post"/>
    <sdef n="stat"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="dogo__BASE_C">
      <e><p><l>m</l> <r><s n="c1"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wa</l><r><s n="c2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l> <r><s n="c3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r><s n="c4"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>  <r><s n="c5"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ma</l><r><s n="c6"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ki</l><r><s n="c7"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r><s n="c8"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l> <r><s n="c9"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l> <r><s n="c10"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l> <r><s n="c11"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l> <r><s n="c14"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r><s n="c15"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pa</l><r><s n="c16"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r><s n="c17"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l> <r><s n="c18"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ema__BASE_V">
      <e><p><l>mw</l><r><s n="c1"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>w</l> <r><s n="c2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mw</l><r><s n="c3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>my</l><r><s n="c4"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j</l> <r><s n="c5"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l> <r><s n="c6"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="c7"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vy</l><r><s n="c8"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nj</l><r><s n="c9"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nj</l><r><s n="c10"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mw</l><r><s n="c11"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mw</l><r><s n="c14"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kw</l><r><s n="c15"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>p</l> <r><s n="c16"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kw</l><r><s n="c17"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mw</l><r><s n="c18"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ingi__BASE_V">
      <e><p><l>mw</l><r><s n="c1"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>w</l> <r><s n="c2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mw</l><r><s n="c3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>my</l><r><s n="c4"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j</l> <r><s n="c5"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>m</l> <r><s n="c6"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r><s n="c7"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vy</l><r><s n="c8"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ny</l><r><s n="c9"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ny</l><r><s n="c10"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mw</l><r><s n="c11"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mw</l><r><s n="c14"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kw</l><r><s n="c15"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>p</l> <r><s n="c16"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kw</l><r><s n="c17"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mw</l><r><s n="c18"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__m/tu">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="sg"/>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wa</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="pl"/>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__ul/imi">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ul</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c11c10"/><s n="sg"/>ul</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nd</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c11c10"/><s n="pl"/>ul</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__uso">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c11c10"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c11c10"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__m/lima">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="sg"/>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="pl"/>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__mw/ili">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mw</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c3c10"/><s n="sg"/>mw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c3c10"/><s n="pl"/>mw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__adui">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c5c1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c5c1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__duka">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n__mbwa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c9c10"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="c9c10"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ni__enc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r><j/>ni<s n="post"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kukat/a__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ika</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="stat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="prsubj__PFX">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wa</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="mtu"><par n="n__m/tu"/><i>tu</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="ulimi"><par n="n__ul/imi"/><i>imi</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="mlima"><par n="n__m/lima"/><i>lima</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="mchana"><par n="n__m/lima"/><i>chana</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="mwili"><par n="n__mw/ili"/><i>ili</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="adui"><par n="n__adui"/><i>adui</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="mbwa"><par n="n__mbwa"/><i>mbwa</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="baba"><par n="n__mbwa"/><i>baba</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="duka la dawa"><par n="n__mbwa"/><i>duka</i><par n="ni__enc"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>dawa</l><r><g><b/>la<b/>dawa</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="duka la madawa"><par n="n__mbwa"/><i>duka</i><par n="ni__enc"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>madawa</l><r><g><b/>la<b/>madawa</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bonde"><par n="n__mbwa"/><i>bonde</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="uso"><par n="n__uso"/><i>uso</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="siku"><par n="n__mbwa"/><i>siku</i><par n="ni__enc"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
